Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
LOTTERY TRANSFER TO EMPLOYER INCENTIVE FUND
SECTION 1.  Section 44, chapter 355, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 44.  (1) The Oregon State Lottery Commission shall separately record and account  for the
costs and net proceeds of sports betting games.
(2) When the commission transfers  net lottery proceeds to the Administrative Services Economic
Development Fund established under ORS 461.540[ ,]:
(a) The commission shall certify to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services the
amount of such transfer that represents the net proceeds of sports betting games[ .];
(b) The Public Employees Retirement Board shall certify to  the department the total
amount of matching amounts approved for disbursement,  but not yet disbursed, from the
Employer Incentive Fund pursuant to section 2, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018; and
[(3)] (c)  The department shall transfer an amount [ equal to the net proceeds of  sports betting
games to the  Employer Incentive Fund established under section 1, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018. ]
to the Employer Incentive Fund from the  Administrative Services Economic Development
Fund equal to the lesser of:
(A) The amount certified under subsection (2)(a) of this section, reduced by  the per-
centage of net lottery proceeds  dedicated to specific purposes under the Oregon Constitution;
or
(B) The amount certified under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
TRANSFERS FOR
GENERAL GOVERNMENTAL PURPOSES
SECTION 2. Section 1, chapter 643, Oregon Laws 2019, and sections 53,  54 and 55, chapter
10, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), are repealed.
Enrolled Senate Bill 846 (SB 846-A) Page 1
SECTION 3.  Section 2, chapter 643, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by  section 50, chapter 10,
Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  Notwithstanding ORS 283.076, the amount of $58,900,000 is transferred from the  Oregon
Department of Administrative Services  Operating Fund to the General Fund for general govern-
mental purposes. The transfer shall be made on [ May 31 ] June 30, 2021.
SECTION 4.  Section 3, chapter  643, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section 51, chapter 10,
Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Notwithstanding ORS 276A.209, the amount  of $33,500,000 is transferred from the State
Information Technology Operating Fund to the General Fund  for general governmental purposes.
The transfer shall be made on [ May 31 ] June 30, 2021.
SECTION 5.  Section 4, chapter 643, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by  section 49, chapter 10,
Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  Notwithstanding ORS 180.095, the amount of $50,666,667  is transferred from the De-
partment of Justice Protection and Education Revolving Account to  the General Fund for general
governmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on [ May 31 ] June 30, 2021.
SECTION 6.  Section 5, chapter 643, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  Notwithstanding ORS  741.102, the amount of $3,800,000 is transferred from the Health
Insurance Exchange Fund to the  General Fund for general governmental purposes. The transfer
shall be made on [ May 31 ] June 30, 2021.
SECTION 7.  Section 7, chapter  643, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section 52, chapter 10,
Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 7.  Notwithstanding ORS 243.167, the amount of $63,000,000 is transferred from the Public
Employees’ Revolving Fund to the General Fund  for general governmental purposes. The transfer
shall be made on [ May 31 ] June 30, 2021.
SECTION 8.  Section 8, chapter 643, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  Notwithstanding ORS 274.064, the amount of $3,000,000 is  transferred from the Portland
Harbor Cleanup Fund to the General Fund  for general governmental purposes. The transfer shall
be made on [ May 31 ] June 30, 2021.
SECTION 9.  Section 56, chapter 10, Oregon  Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to
read:
Sec. 56.  Notwithstanding ORS 180.205, the amount of $500,000  is transferred from the Tobacco
Enforcement Fund to  the General Fund for general governmental purposes. The transfer shall be
made on [ May 31 ] June 30, 2021.
SECTION 10.  Section 58, chapter 10, Oregon  Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to
read:
Sec. 58.  Notwithstanding section 24, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2018, the amount of $33,133,022
is transferred  from the School Districts Unfunded Liability Fund to the General Fund for general
governmental purposes. The transfer shall be made on [ May 31 ] June 30, 2021.
SECTION 11.  Section 59, chapter 10, Oregon  Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to
read:
Sec. 59.  Notwithstanding ORS 414.815, the amount of $2,100,000 is  transferred from the Law
Enforcement Medical Liability Account  to the General Fund for general governmental purposes. The
transfer shall be made on [ May 31 ] June 30, 2021.
SECTION 12.  Section 60, chapter 10, Oregon  Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to
read:
Sec. 60.  Notwithstanding ORS 327.008 and 327.026, the amount  of $1,500,000 is transferred from
the State School Fund, from moneys  allocated to the Youth Corrections Education Program and the
Juvenile Detention Education Program, to  the General Fund for general governmental purposes. The
transfer shall be made on [ May 31 ] June 30, 2021.
SECTION 13.  Section 62, chapter 10, Oregon  Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to
read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 846 (SB 846-A) Page 2
Sec. 62. Notwithstanding ORS 346.315, the amount of $500,000 is transferred from the Blind and
Visually Impaired Student Fund to the General Fund for  general governmental purposes. The
transfer shall be made on [ May 31 ] June 30, 2021.
SECTION 14.  Section 63, chapter 10, Oregon  Laws 2020 (second special session), is amended to
read:
Sec. 63.  Notwithstanding ORS 652.409, the amount of $1,500,000 is transferred from the  Wage
Security Fund to  the General Fund for general governmental purposes. The transfer shall be made
on [ May 31 ] June 30, 2021.
DRUG ADDICTION TREATMENT AND RECOVERY ACT
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding section 2, chapter 2,  Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure
110 (2020)), the Oregon Health  Authority shall directly oversee and approve expenditures,
including the provision of grants, from the Drug Treatment and  Recovery Services Fund
established in section 5, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure  110 (2020)), consistent
with the intent of the Legislative Assembly, for the biennium ending June 30, 2021.
SECTION 16.  Section 2, chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot  Measure 110 (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 2.  [ Grants Program. ] (1) The Oversight and Accountability Council shall oversee and  ap-
prove grants to implement  Addiction Recovery Centers and increase access to community care, as
set forth below.
(2)(a) [ Addiction Recovery Centers. ] The Oversight and Accountability Council shall provide
grants to existing agencies or organizations, whether government or [ community-based] community
based, to [ create] establish Addiction Recovery  Centers for the purposes of immediately triaging the
acute needs  of people who use drugs and assessing and addressing any [ on-going] ongoing needs
[thorough] through intensive case management and linkage to care and services.
[(a)] (b) Grants  must be disbursed such that at least one center shall be established within each
existing coordinated care organization service area. Centers within each existing  coordinated care
organization service area shall be established and operational by [ October 1, 2021 ] January  1,
2022.
[(b)] (c) Grantees must be able  to provide or display an ability to provide the following services
to any Oregon resident who requests it, in order to receive funding as an  Addiction Recovery Cen-
ter:
[(i)] (A) 24/7 triage .[:] Centers  shall assess a client’s need for immediate medical or other
treatment shortly  upon the client’s arrival to determine what acute care is needed and where it can
be best provided. Centers shall  provide this service [ twenty-four] 24 hours a day, seven days a week,
365 days a year. Notwithstanding paragraph (b) of this subsection,  only one center within
each coordinated care organization service area is required to provide the triage assessments
set forth in this subparagraph.
[(ii)] (B) Health assessment .[:] Centers shall conduct a comprehensive  behavioral health needs
assessment for each client,  including a substance use disorder screening by a certified alcohol and
drug counselor or other credentialed addiction treatment professional. The assessment shall  prior-
itize the self-identified needs of the client.
[(iii)] (C) Individual intervention plan, intensive  case management and connection to
services .[:] If, after the completion of the assessment, the client indicates a  desire to address some
or all of the identified needs, a case manager shall work with the client to  design an individual
intervention plan. The plan must address the client’s need for substance use  disorder treatment,
coexisting health problems, housing, employment and training, [ childcare] child care and other ser-
vices. Intensive case management requires,  in the least, that case managers have a sufficiently low
staff-to-client ratio to provide daily support as needed  to connect clients to services and care needed
to fulfill the individual intervention plan  and have the capacity to [ follow-up] follow up to ensure
Enrolled Senate Bill 846 (SB 846-A) Page 3
clients are accessing care and, if not, to reconnect  clients to care as necessary and as desired by
clients.
[(iv)] (D) Peer support .[:] Each center shall offer ongoing peer  counseling and support from
triage and assessment through  implementation of individual intervention plans as well as provide
peer outreach workers  to engage directly with marginalized community members who could poten-
tially benefit from the center’s services.
[(v)] (E) Outreach .[:] Each center shall assess the need for, and provide, mobile or virtual out-
reach services to reach clients who are unable to access the center.
[(A) Notwithstanding subsection (2)(a) of  this section, only one center within each coordinated care
organization service area is required to provide the triage assessments set forth in  subsection (2)(b)(i)
of this section. ]
[(c)] (d) All services provided at  the centers must be evidence-informed, trauma-informed, cul-
turally responsive,  patient-centered, [ non-judgmental,] nonjudgmental and centered on principles of
harm reduction. The goal of the  individual intervention plan and intensive case management shall
be to address effectively the client’s substance use disorder and  any other factors driving problem-
atic behaviors without employing coercion or shame or mandating abstinence.
[(d)] (e) The centers shall be adequately staffed to address the needs of  people with substance
use disorder within their  regions as determined by the Oversight and Accountability Council, but
must include, at a minimum, at least one person qualified in each of the following categories:
(A) Certified alcohol and  drug counselor or other credentialed addiction treatment professional;
(B) Intensive case manager; and[ ,]
(C) Peer support specialist.
[(e)] (f) Each center shall provide timely verification on behalf of any client  who has completed
a health  assessment, as set forth in subsection [ (2)(b)(ii)] (2)(c)(B) of this section, if the client re-
quests such verification to  comply with section 22 or [ section] 23 (2) , chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021
(Ballot Measure 110 (2020))  [ of this Act ].
(3) [ Increasing Community  Access to Care. ] The Oversight and Accountability Council shall pro-
vide grants to existing agencies or organizations, whether government or community based, to in-
crease access to one or more of the following:
(a) Low barrier substance use disorder treatment that is evidence-informed,  trauma-informed,
culturally responsive, patient-centered[ ,] and [ non-judgmental] nonjudgmental;
(b) Peer support and recovery services;
(c) Transitional, supportive[ ,] and permanent housing for persons with  substance use disorder;
or
(d) Harm  reduction interventions including, but not limited to, overdose prevention education,
access to naloxone hydrochloride and sterile syringes[ ,] and stimulant-specific drug education and
outreach.
(4) The council shall prioritize providing grants to  community-based nonprofit organizations
within each coordinated care organization service area. However, if within any such service  area
a community-based nonprofit organization does not apply  for a grant or grants are not sought within
that service area for which services are needed, then the council may request and  fund grants to
any community care organization or county within that service area.
(5) Services provided by grantees, including services provided by Addiction Recovery Centers,
shall be free of charge to the persons receiving the services. To the extent consistent with applica-
ble law, grantees and  service providers may seek and obtain reimbursement for services provided
to any person from any insurer or entity providing insurance to that person.
SECTION 17.
 Section 23, chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 23.  [ Implementation.] (1) Not  later than February 1, 2021, the Oregon Health Authority[ ,
Health Systems Division Behavioral Health  Services ] shall establish a statewide temporary telephone
Addiction Recovery Center. The temporary telephone  Addiction Recovery Center shall be staffed
[twenty-four] 24 hours a day,  seven days a week, 365 days a year. The temporary telephone Addiction
Enrolled Senate Bill 846 (SB 846-A) Page 4
Recovery Center shall provide the services  set forth in section 2 [ (2)(b)(i)-(iii)] (2)(c)(A) to (C),
chapter 2, Oregon  Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),  and the verification set forth in section
2 [(2)(e)] (2)(f), chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
(2) Until such time as an Addiction Recovery Center is established in the  coordinated care or-
ganization service  area where a person subject to the penalty set forth in ORS 153.018 (2)(e) for a
violation that has been classified or reclassified as a Class E violation  pursuant to [ section 11 to
section 19 ] ORS 153.012, 153.018, 475.752, 475.824, 475.834, 475.854, 475.874, 475.884 and 475.894
resides, the person shall be  fined up to $100, but in lieu of the fine may complete a health assess-
ment, as set forth in section 2 [ (2)(b)(ii)] (2)(c)(B), chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2021 (Ballot Measure
110 (2020)), through the temporary telephone Addiction Recovery Center. Upon verification that  the
person has  received a health assessment through the temporary telephone Addiction Recovery
Center within 45 days of when the person  receives a citation for a violation subject to the penalty
set forth in ORS 153.018 (2)(e), the fine shall be waived. Failure to pay the fine shall  not be a basis
for further penalties or for a term of incarceration.
(3) When an Addiction Recovery Center is established  in each coordinated care organization
service area, and not later  than [ October 1, 2021 ] January 1, 2022 , the temporary telephone Ad-
diction Recovery Center shall be terminated.
SECTION 18.  Section 4, chapter 2,  Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)), is amended
to read:
Sec. 4.  [ Administration.] (1)(a) On or before [ June 30, 2021 ] September 1, 2021,  the Oversight
and Accountability Council shall adopt rules  that establish general criteria and requirements for the
Addiction Recovery Centers and the grants required by section 2 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2021
(Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
(b) The council shall from time to time  adopt such rules, and amend and revise rules it has
adopted, as it deems  proper and necessary for the administration of [ this Act ] chapter 2, Oregon
Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),  and the performance of its work.
(2) On and after July 1, 2021,  the council shall have and retain the authority  to implement and
oversee  the  Addiction Recovery Centers [ created by ] established under  section 2 , chapter 2,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)),  and the grants program created and required by
section 2 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
(3) The Oregon Health Authority[ , Health Systems  Division Behavioral Health Services ] shall
administer and provide all necessary support to  ensure the implementation of [ this Act ] chapter 2,
Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
(4)(a) The authority, [ Oregon Health Authority, Health  Systems Division Behavioral Health Ser-
vices,] in consultation with the council, may  enter into interagency agreements to ensure proper
distribution  of  funds for the grants created and required by section 2 , chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021
(Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
(b) The authority [ Oregon Health Authority, Health Systems Division Behavioral Health
Services] shall encourage and take all reasonable measures to ensure that grant recipients  cooper-
ate, coordinate and act jointly with  one another to offer the services described in section 2 , chapter
2, Oregon Laws 2021 (Ballot Measure 110 (2020)) .
(5) The authority [ Oregon Health Authority, Health Systems Division Behavioral Health
Services] shall provide requested technical, logistical and other support  to the council to assist the
council with its duties and obligations.
EDUCATION
SECTION 19. (1) The  Summer Learning Program Account is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The account consists of moneys appropriated, allocated,  deposited or transferred to
the account by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise.
Enrolled Senate Bill 846 (SB 846-A) Page 5
(3) The Department of Education, on behalf of  the State of Oregon, may solicit and ac-
cept gifts, grants, donations and other moneys from public and private sources for  deposit
in the account.
(4) Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the Department of  Education
to disburse or expend for activities or programs related to providing summer academic and
enrichment opportunities for school-aged children.
(5) The Department of Education may enter  into grant agreements, contracts, intergov-
ernmental agreements  or other agreements with school districts, community-based organ-
izations, nonprofit organizations, federally recognized tribes or other entities to  provide
summer academic and enrichment programs and may disburse or expend  moneys from the
account pursuant to such agreements.
(6) The State Board of  Education may adopt rules necessary for the administration of the
account.
SECTION 20.
(1) Of the moneys  appropriated by section 89, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2021 (Enrolled House Bill 5042), to the Department of Education for distribution to the
Oregon Community Foundation, the Oregon Community Foundation shall remit  to the de-
partment any amounts that are unexpended and uncommitted on November 1, 2021.
(2) The department shall transfer any moneys remitted under this section to the  General
Fund for general governmental purposes.
SECTION 21.
Of the moneys appropriated by section 87, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled House Bill 5042), for deposit in the Summer Learning Program Account  established
by section 19 of this 2021 Act, any amounts that are unexpended and uncommitted  on Janu-
ary 1, 2022, are transferred to the General Fund for general governmental purposes.
SECTION 22. The unit captions used in this 2021 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 23. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House April 16, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 846 (SB 846-A) Page 6